Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.420

Inspections.

(1) Any person authorized by the department to operate a food facility must provide the department access for inspection to any part, portion, or area of the food facility or its records subject to the authorization.

(2) When possible, the department must make any such inspection during regular business hours or during a working shift of the food facility, except that the department may inspect such food facility at any time upon information of conditions that constitute immediate danger to public health.

[ 2018 c 236 s 403.]